District of Columbia statutes.
37-201.21

Sale of pro rata quantity.

Whenever any commodity is offered for sale at a stated price for a stated quantity, a smaller quantity shall be sold at a pro rata price unless the purchaser is informed to the contrary at the time of sale.

Mar. 3, 1921, 41 Stat. 1224, ch. 118, § 21

History

1981 Ed., § 10-124.
1973 Ed., § 10-123.

Prior Codifications